Illinois, session 104th, HB3775.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 16-95 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/16-95)7    Sec. 16-95. Powers and duties of board of appeals or 8review; complaints. In counties with 3,000,000 or more 9inhabitants, until the first Monday in December 1998, the 10board of appeals in any year shall, on complaint that any 11property is overassessed or underassessed, or is exempt, 12review and order the assessment corrected.13    Beginning the first Monday in December 1998 and 14thereafter, in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 15the board of review: 16        (1) shall, on written complaint of any taxpayer or any 17    taxing district that has an interest in the assessment 18    that any property is overassessed, underassessed, or 19    exempt, review the assessment and confirm, revise, 20    correct, alter, or modify the assessment, as appears to be 21    just; and 22        (2) may, upon written motion of any one or more 23    members of the board that is made on or before the dates   HB3775- 2 -LRB104 09772 SPS 19838 b1    specified in notices given under Section 16-110 for each 2    township and upon good cause shown, revise, correct, 3    alter, or modify any assessment (or part of an assessment) 4    of real property regardless of whether the taxpayer or 5    owner of the property has filed a complaint with the 6    board; and7        (3) shall, after the effective date of this amendatory 8    Act of the 96th General Assembly, pursuant to the 9    provisions of Sections 9-260, 9-265, 2-270, 16-135, and 10    16-140, review any omitted assessment proposed by the 11    county assessor and confirm, revise, correct, alter, or 12    modify the proposed assessment, as appears to be just.13    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, if the 14board of review determines that an error or mistake has been 15made in any assessment, other than an error of judgment as to 16the valuation of the property, the board of review shall issue 17to the person erroneously assessed a certificate setting forth 18the nature of the error and its cause or causes. The 19certificate may be used in evidence in any court of competent 20jurisdiction. After the board of review has issued a 21certificate of error, 2 copies of the certificate shall be 22made. One of those copies shall be given to the county clerk, 23and one of those copies shall be given to the county treasurer. 24The county clerk shall keep records of the changes or 25corrections made in the certificate and shall certify those 26corrections to the county treasurer so that the county   HB3775- 3 -LRB104 09772 SPS 19838 b1treasurer is able to account for the proper amount of taxes 2chargeable against the property. 3    No assessment may be changed by the board on its own motion 4until the taxpayer in whose name the property is assessed and 5the chief county assessment officer who certified the 6assessment have been notified and given an opportunity to be 7heard thereon. All taxing districts shall have an opportunity 8to be heard on the matter.9(Source: P.A. 96-1553, eff. 3-10-11.)